Ohio, session 136, SB439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3722.15 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3722.15. (A) Not later than January 1, 2027, and subject to division (B) of this section, each hospital shall develop and implement a discharge plan for a pregnant individual admitted to the hospital who is both of the following: (1) Exhibiting signs and experiencing symptoms consistent with labor, which may include contractions; (2) Expected to be discharged before delivery, as determined and documented by the treating physician or practitioner based on the physician's or practitioner's clinical judgment at the time that discharge is contemplated. (B) In developing and implementing a discharge plan for a pregnant individual described in division (A) of this section, a hospital's plan shall do the following: (1) Provide a clinical justification for the discharge; (2) Assess the travel distance and time between the hospital and the pregnant individual's primary residence; (3) Verify reliable transportation between the hospital and the pregnant individual's primary residence; (4) Identify an alternate hospital or facility at which the pregnant individual may obtain labor and delivery services; (5) Confirm that the discharge plan was reviewed and approved by a practitioner who the hospital has determined is qualified to do so under rules adopted by the director of health; (6) Confirm that the pregnant individual or individual's representative has received a copy of the discharge plan that is written in the individual's or representative's primary language and has confirmed the individual's or representative's understanding of its contents. (C) Before discharging a pregnant individual described in division (A) of this section, a hospital shall do all of the following: (1) Include a copy of the discharge plan in the pregnant individual's medical record; (2) Provide the pregnant individual or individual's representative with a copy of the discharge plan that is written in the individual's or representative's primary language; (3) Discuss the discharge plan with the pregnant individual or individual's representative. (D) The director of health shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section, including those described in division (B)(5) of this section. All rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Section 2. This act shall be known as the Women Expansion of Learning and Labor Safety or WELLS Act.